Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1376.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin RED RIVER BASIN WATER STORAGE AND FLOOD MITIGATION INFRASTRUCTURE PROJECTS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin (a) $48,586,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the commissioner of natural resources for the state share of flood hazard mitigation grants for publicly owned capital improvements to prevent or alleviate flood damage under Minnesota Statutes, section 103F.161, subdivision 3, and to enhance natural resources. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 103F.161, subdivision 2, a grant for implementation of a flood hazard mitigation project in the Red River Basin, consistent with the 1998 mediation agreement and approved by the Red River flood damage reduction work group, may be for up to 75 percent of the cost of the proposed mitigation measures. Of this appropriation: new text end new text begin (1) $2,000,000 is for a grant to the Middle-Snake-Tamarac Rivers Watershed District for a flood prevention project to remove the city of Newfolden from the 100-year floodplain; new text end new text begin (2) $13,748,000 is for a grant to the Bois de Sioux Watershed District for the construction of the Mustinka River Rehabilitation - Redpath Impoundment Project; new text end new text begin (3) $9,000,000 is for a grant to the Roseau River Watershed District for the construction of the Roseau Lake Rehabilitation project; new text end new text begin (4) $2,000,000 is for a grant to the Middle-Snake-Tamarac Rivers Watershed District for a flood prevention project to increase storage capacity and improve water level control at Nelson Slough/JD 19; new text end new text begin (5) $17,338,000 is for a grant to the Two Rivers Watershed District for final engineering, permitting, land acquisition, and construction of Phases 1, 2, and 3 of the Klondike Clean Water Retention Project; and new text end new text begin (6) $4,500,000 is for a grant to the Roseau River Watershed District for permitting, plans, easement acquisition, and final design of the Whitney Lake retention sites to the Whitney Lake Project. new text end new text begin (b) For the purpose of determining any local match required, the project includes all local flood-related activities. new text end new text begin (c) To the extent that the cost of the project exceeds two percent of the median household income in the municipality multiplied by the number of households in the municipality, this appropriation is also for the local share of the project. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $48,586,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end